src/eng-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols

! POS
+N +V +A 
+Adv +CC +CS +Interj +Pron +Num

! Verbal MSP
+Prs +Prt +Prf +Prog
+Ind +Imp
+Inf

! Nominal MSP
+Sg +Pl +Sg3
+Nom +Acc 
+Refl

! Other MSP
+P +Det +Dem
+Nom +Acc +Poss

+CLB +PUNCT +LEFT +RIGHT
! Key lexicon

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Verb ;
Adjective ;
Adverb ;
Conjunction ;
Subjunction ;
Interjection ;
Numeral ;
Pronoun ;
Determiner ;
Preposition ;
Punctuation ;



! I include some small lexica here
! waiting for own files, or perhaps they could stay here


LEXICON Numeral
onetonine ;
teens ;

LEXICON onetonine
one NUMBERSUF ;
two NUMBERSUF ;
three NUMBERSUF ;
four NUMBERSUF ;
five NUMBERSUF ;
six NUMBERSUF ;
seven NUMBERSUF ;
eight NUMBERSUF ;
nine NUMBERSUF ;

LEXICON teens
eleven NUMBERSUF ;
twelwe NUMBERSUF ;
thirteen NUMBERSUF ;
fourteen NUMBERSUF ;
fifteen NUMBERSUF ;
sixteen  NUMBERSUF ;
eighteen NUMBERSUF ;
nineteen NUMBERSUF ;


million NUMBERSUF ;
milliard NUMBERSUF ;

LEXICON NUMBERSUF
+Num: # ;
